Massachusetts, session 194th, H2374.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 117A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “$3,500” the following:
“excluding cash advance items for services not directly provided by the funeral establishment.
The department shall promptly make a determination regarding applications submitted pursuant
to this section and, if approved, shall issue payments promptly."
of 1